test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-viessot_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - viessot: # Verb 'live'
     viessot+V+Inf: viessot
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viesov
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vieso
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vessu
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vessun
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [viessobehtin, viessobähtten]
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [viessoba, viessoban]
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viessop
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [viessobehtit, viessobähttet]
     viessot+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vessu

     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vessuv
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vessu
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viesoj
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viesojmen
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viesojden
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [viesojga, viesojgan]
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viesojme
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viesojde
     viessot+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vessun

     viessot+V+Imprt+Sg2: vieso  
     viessot+V+Imprt+Du2: viesson
     viessot+V+Imprt+Pl2: vessut

#     viessot+V+Pot+Sg1: vesutjav
#     viessot+V+Pot+Sg2: vesutja
#     viessot+V+Pot+Sg3: vesutj
#     viessot+V+Pot+Du1: vesutjin
#     viessot+V+Pot+Du2: [vesutjähppen, vesutjehpin]
#     viessot+V+Pot+Du3: vesutjiebá
#     viessot+V+Pot+Pl1: vesutjip
#     viessot+V+Pot+Pl2: vesutjihpit
#     viessot+V+Pot+Pl3: vesutji

     viessot+V+ConNeg: vieso 
     viessot+V+GerI: viesodin 
#     viessot+V+Sup: viesotjit
#     viessot+V+Vabe: viessok  
     viessot+V+Vgen: vieso 
     viessot+V+GerII: viessomin
     viessot+V+PrfPrc: vessum
#     viessot+V+PrsPrc: viesso 
#     viessot+V+Vsubst: viessom
